Washington statutes.
RCW 41.32.390

Contributions for prior service credits.

At least twenty percent of the total amount due for prior service credit must be paid before an application for credit may be presented to the department for approval. The balance is not due until date of retirement and may be paid at that time without additional charge. Any unpaid installments at the time the member is retired for service or disability shall constitute a first, paramount, and prior lien against his or her retirement allowance.

[ 1991 c 35 s 49; 1955 c 274 s 18; 1947 c 80 s 39; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 4995-58. Prior: 1941 c 97 s 5, part; 1939 c 86 s 5, part; 1937 c 221 s 6, part; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 4995-6, part.]

NOTES:

Intent—1991 c 35: See note following RCW 41.26.005.